Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3

Regulations and Registration

53-11-301. Rules and fees for controlled drugs.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances may promulgate rules and charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, dispensing, warehousing of, and the provision of logistics services for controlled substances within this state.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 17; 1971, ch. 408, § 1; 1981, ch. 358, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1424; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 13; 2015, ch. 293, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Section 39-17-401 provides that title 39, ch. 17, part 4 and title 53, ch. 11, parts 3 and 4 shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Drug Control Act of 1989.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “the manufacture, distribution, dispensing, warehousing of, and the provision of logistics services for controlled substances” for “the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 293, § 7. April 24, 2015.

Cross-References. Definition of terms used in this part, § 39-17-402.

Drugs, criminal offenses, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Smoking offenses concerning children, §§ 39-15-407 — 39-15-413.

Cited: McLean v. State, 527 S.W.2d 76, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. 1975); Moore v. State, 568 S.W.2d 632, 1978 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 309 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1978).

53-11-302. Handlers of controlled substances — Registration and inspection.

Every person who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or is a third-party logistics provider for any controlled substance pursuant to § 53-11-301 within this state or who proposes to engage in the manufacture, distribution, dispensing, warehousing, or providing logistics services for any controlled substance within this state, shall annually obtain a registration issued by the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances in accordance with the licensing board's rules.

Persons registered by the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances under this part, part 4 of this chapter, and title 39, chapter 17, part 4, to manufacture, distribute, dispense, warehouse, or provide logistics services for controlled substances may possess, manufacture, warehouse, distribute, or dispense those substances to the extent authorized by their registration and in conformity with this section.

The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess controlled substances under this part, part 4 of this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 4:

A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee of a common or contract carrier or warehouseman, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual course of business or employment; or

An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful possession of a Schedule V substance.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances may waive by rule the requirement for registration of certain manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or entities providing warehousing or logistics services if they find it consistent with the public health and safety.

A separate registration is required at each principal place of business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures, distributes or dispenses controlled substances.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances may inspect the establishment of a registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with the board's rules and regulations.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 18; 1977, ch. 180, § 3; T.C.A., § 52-1425; Acts 1996, ch. 675, §§ 51, 52; 2015, ch. 293, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a), which read: “Every person who manufactures, distributes or dispenses any controlled substance pursuant to § 53-11-301 within this state or who proposes to engage in the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of any controlled substance within this state, must obtain annually a registration issued by the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances in accordance with the licensing board's rules;” in (b), added “, warehouse, or provide logistics services for” preceding “controlled substances” and added “warehouse” preceding “, distribute”, and deleted “the other provisions of” preceding “this section” at the end; and in (d), added “or entities providing warehousing or logistics services” following “dispensers”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 293, § 7. April 24, 2015.

Cited: McLean v. State, 527 S.W.2d 76, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. 1975).

53-11-303. Criteria for registration issuance.

The state board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances shall register an applicant to manufacture or distribute controlled substances included in title 39, chapter 17, part 4, unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local law;

Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture or distribution of controlled substances, and the existence in the applicant's establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this part and part 4 of this chapter, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant's federal registration to manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health and safety.

Registration under subsection (a) does not entitle a registrant to manufacture and distribute controlled substances in Schedule I, II or VI other than those specified in the registration.

Practitioners must be registered to dispense any controlled substances in Schedules II through V if they are authorized to dispense under the law of this state.

Compliance by manufacturers and distributors with the federal law respecting registration, excluding fees, entitles them to be registered under this part, part 4 of this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 19; T.C.A., § 52-1426; Acts 1996, ch. 675, §§ 53, 54.

Compiler's Notes. The controlled substances schedules referred to in (b) and (c) appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

53-11-304. Suspension and revocation of registration.

A registration under § 53-11-302 to manufacture, warehouse, distribute, dispense, or provide logistics services for a controlled substance may be suspended or revoked by the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances upon a finding that the registrant has:

Furnished false or fraudulent material information in any application filed under this part and part 4 of this chapter, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

Been convicted of a felony under any state or federal law relating to any controlled substance; or

Had the registrant's federal registration suspended or revoked to manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances may limit revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

If the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances suspend or revoke a registration, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order may be placed under seal.

No disposition may be made of substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded, unless a court, upon application for disposition, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court.

Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances shall promptly notify the bureau, as defined in § 39-17-402, of all orders suspending or revoking registration and all forfeitures of controlled substances.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 20; T.C.A., § 52-1427; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 55; 2015, ch. 293, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “A registration under § 53-11-302 to manufacture, warehouse, distribute, dispense, or provide logistics services for a controlled substance” for “A registration under § 53-11-302 to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance” at the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 293, § 7. April 24, 2015.

Cross-References. Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, ch. 5, part 1.

53-11-305. Revocation, suspension or denial of registration.

Before denying, suspending or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances shall serve upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why registration should not be denied, revoked or suspended, or why the renewal should not be refused.

The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the basis for denying, suspending or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration and shall call upon the applicant or registrant to appear before the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances at a time and place not less than thirty (30) days after the date of service of the order, but in the case of a denial of renewal of registration, the show cause order shall be served not later than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the registration.

Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration shall not abate the existing registration, which shall remain in effect pending the outcome of the administrative hearing.

The board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances may suspend, without an order to show cause, any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under § 53-11-304, or where renewal of registration is refused, if they find that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety that warrants this action.

The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review of the suspension, unless sooner withdrawn by the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 21; 1973, ch. 110, § 15; T.C.A., § 52-1428.

Cross-References. Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, title 4, ch. 5, part 1.

53-11-306. Records and inventories required.

Persons registered to manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled substances under this part and part 4 of this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 4, shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the record keeping and inventory requirements of federal law, and with any additional rules the board of pharmacy and the appropriate occupational or professional licensing board governing persons who may legally dispense controlled substances.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 22; T.C.A., § 52-1429; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 56.

53-11-307. Inter-registrant distribution.

Controlled substances in Schedules I and II shall be distributed by a registrant to another registrant only pursuant to an order form.

Compliance with federal law respecting order forms shall be deemed compliance with this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 23; T.C.A., § 52-1430.

Compiler's Notes. The controlled substances schedules, referred to in this section, appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

53-11-308. Prescription requirements.

Except when dispensed directly by a health care prescriber other than a pharmacy to an ultimate user, no controlled substance in Schedule II may be dispensed without the electronic prescription of a health care prescriber, unless authorized by § 63-1-160. To the extent federal law does not permit an electronic prescription, a written prescription from a health care prescriber is required.

In emergency situations, Schedule II drugs may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a health care prescriber, reduced promptly to writing or to electronic form, as appropriate, and filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the requirements of § 53-11-306. No prescription for a Schedule II substance may be refilled.

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner other than a pharmacy to an ultimate user, a controlled substance included in Schedule III or IV that is a prescription drug shall not be dispensed without a written or oral prescription of a practitioner. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date of the written or oral prescription or be refilled more than five (5) times, unless renewed by the practitioner.

A controlled substance included in Schedule V shall not be distributed or dispensed other than for a medical purpose.

No prescription for any opioids or benzodiazepines may be dispensed in quantities greater than a thirty-day supply.

If a prescriber dispenses any opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, or carisoprodol, then the prescriber shall submit the transaction to the controlled substances monitoring database operated under chapter 10, part 3 of this title.

Any prescribers of opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates or carisoprodol, either alone, concurrently, or sequentially with any other opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, or carisoprodol to patients who are in chronic, long-term drug therapy for ninety (90) days or longer shall consider mandatory urine drug testing. This subsection (g) shall not supercede any rules promulgated by the commissioner for urine drug testing by registered pain management clinics.

Prior to prescribing more than a three-day supply of an opioid or an opioid dosage that exceeds a total of a one hundred eighty (180) morphine milligram equivalent dose to a woman of childbearing age, a prescriber shall:

Advise the patient of the risk associated with opioid use during pregnancy;

Counsel the patient on appropriate and effective forms of birth control; and

Offer information about the availability of free or reduced cost birth control to the patient.

As used in this subsection (h) “a woman of childbearing age” means any woman between the ages of fifteen (15) and forty-four (44).

This subsection (h) does not apply if:

The prescriber has previously taken all actions required by subdivision (h)(1) with respect to the patient within the past three (3) months; or

The prescriber reasonably believes that the patient is not capable of becoming pregnant.

If the patient is under eighteen (18) years of age, the physician may satisfy this subsection (h) by advising, counseling, and providing information to the parent or guardian instead of the patient. This subdivision (h)(4) does not prohibit a physician from advising, counseling, and providing information directly to the patient if not otherwise prohibited by law.

The department of health shall develop and publish guidance to assist prescribers of opioids in complying with this subsection (h).

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 24; T.C.A., § 52-1431; Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 4; 2018, ch. 883, § 2; 2018, ch. 901, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The controlled substances schedules, referred to in this section, appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which added subsections (e)-(g), shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (e)-(g).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 883, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “health care prescriber” for “practitioner” preceding “other” and “electronic prescription of a health care prescriber, unless authorized by § 63-1-160. To the extent federal law does not permit an electronic prescription, a written prescription from a health care prescriber is required” for “written prescription of a practitioner” at the end; in (b), substituted “health care prescriber” for “practitioner” following “prescription of a”, inserted “or to electronic form, as appropriate,” and substituted “§ 53-11-306” for “§ 53-11-305”.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 901, effective July 1, 2018, added (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 16. October 1, 2013; provided, that, for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations, the act took effect May 16, 2013.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 12. January 1, 2019; provided that for rulemaking purposes the act took effect May 3, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 901, § 3. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Substitution of drugs in filling prescriptions prohibited, § 39-17-421.

Cited: State v. Dominy, 6 S.W.3d 472, 1999 Tenn. LEXIS 571 (Tenn. 1999); State v. Robinson, 139 S.W.3d 661, 2004 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 82 (Tenn. Crim. App. 2004).

53-11-309. Reporting persons obtaining or attempting to obtain controlled substances — Immunity — Exception.

Any physician, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, veterinarian, pharmacist, advanced practice registered nurse with a certificate of fitness issued under title 63, chapter 7, or physician assistant, hereinafter referred to collectively as “health care providers”, who has actual knowledge that a person has knowingly, willfully and with intent to deceive, obtained or attempted to obtain controlled substances in the manner prohibited by § 53-11-402(a)(6) shall cause a report to be submitted regarding such activity within five (5) business days of obtaining such knowledge. The report should be submitted to the local law enforcement agency where the health care provider is located or, where one exists, to a judicial district or multi-judicial district drug task force. The controlled substance database advisory committee established by § 53-10-303 shall develop a form by no later than August 1, 2010, that health care providers may choose to use to make reports. The department of health shall make the form available on its web site.

Any physician or advanced practice registered nurse with a certificate of fitness issued under title 63, chapter 7, or physician assistant who has actual knowledge that a person has knowingly, willfully and with the intent to deceive, obtained or attempted to obtain controlled substances in the manner prohibited by § 53-11-402(a)(6) and who is providing treatment to a person with a mental illness as defined in § 33-1-101 may, but is not required to, report as provided for under subsection (a).

If the health care provider's actual knowledge of conduct prohibited by § 53-11-402(a)(6) is a result of the health care provider accessing the information available in the controlled substance database established in § 53-10-304, then notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions in § 53-10-306, the local law enforcement agency or, where one exists, a judicial district or multi-judicial district drug task force may receive from the health care provider only the pertinent information from the database for the thirty (30) days prior to the date of treatment leading to the alleged offense which ostensibly demonstrates non-compliance with § 53-11-402(a)(6). A report with information from the database not exceeding thirty (30) days prior to the date of treatment made under this provision to local law enforcement or, where one exists, to a judicial district or multi-judicial district drug task force is sufficient grounds for the production of complete or more detailed controlled substance database information for purposes of a criminal investigation or pending prosecution pursuant to the procedures established by § 53-10-306(b).

A health care provider, or any person under the direction of the health care provider or any entity that assumes the responsibility of reporting for the provider who furnishes any information in good faith is immune from liability if a complaint, report, information, or record is furnished to a law enforcement agency.

This section shall not apply in the case of a person who, on the date of treatment by the health care provider, is enrolled in or covered by TennCare.

Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 1; 2010, ch. 663, § 1; 2012, ch. 880, § 22; 2016, ch. 980, § 3; 2016, ch. 1002, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 25 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (b)(1) effective from January 1, 2013, until July 1, 2016, shall be interpreted to be consistent with all state and federal laws addressing privacy of patient records.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 13, deleted the provisions of Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 29 that provided for the expiration of the amendments by Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 22. Therefore, those amendments remain in effect.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Any physician, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, veterinarian, nurse authorized pursuant to § 63-6-204 or § 63-9-113, or physician assistant who has good reason to believe a person has obtained or attempts to obtain controlled substances prohibited under § 53-11-402(a)(6) shall report the activity within three (3) business days to the local law enforcement agency for investigation.“(b) A health care provider is immune from civil liability if the health care provider, operating in good faith, makes a complaint or furnishes a report, information or records to law enforcement agencies pursuant to this section.”

The 2012 amendment by ch. 880, as amended by Acts 2016, ch. 1002, inserted “pharmacist,” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2016 amendment by ch. 980, substituted “advanced practice registered nurse” for “advanced practice nurse” in the first sentence of (a) and near the beginning of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 67, § 4. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 663, § 4. March 30, 2010.

Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 29. January 1, 2013; provided, that, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations, including emergency rulemaking, the act shall take effect May 9, 2012; and provided further, that the provisions of the act shall expire and be of no force and effect after June 30, 2016, and on July 1, 2016, the existing provisions of title 53, chapter 10, part 3, shall be revived and reenacted as they were codified on March 1, 2012.

Acts 2016, ch. 980, § 25. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1002, § 17. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Employee or contractor’s unauthorized use of medical doctor’s DEA registration number to write prescriptions, § 63-6-242.

53-11-310. Identification requirements for dispensing of certain Schedule II to IV prescription medications for greater than a seven-day supply.

Prior to an authorized dispenser dispensing a prescription for any Schedule II-IV opioid, benzodiazepine, zolpidem, barbiturate, or carisoprodol medication for greater than a seven-day supply, a pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy intern, or any other person authorized to dispense controlled substances shall require the person taking possession of the dispensed prescription to present a valid government issued identification or public or private insurance card, unless the person is personally known to the pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy intern or any other person authorized to dispense controlled substances. The identification requirements described in subsection (a) shall apply to all authorized dispensers who dispense Schedule II-IV opioid, benzodiazepine, zolpidem, barbiturate, and carisoprodol medications for greater than a seven-day supply.

Should any person who is a minor or who is homeless seek to take possession of a dispensed prescription for a Schedule II-IV opioid, benzodiazepine, zolpidem, barbiturate, or carisoprodol medication not have a valid identification, the pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy intern or any other person authorized to dispense controlled substances shall use professional judgment in determining whether to dispense the prescription to the person.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Require that the person taking possession of a Schedule II-IV opioid, benzodiazepine, zolpidem, barbiturate, or carisoprodol medication and the person for whom the prescription is written be the same person;

Apply to any controlled substance dispensed by a licensed veterinarian;

Apply to drug samples dispensed by a healthcare professional; or

Apply to prescriptions written for:

Inpatients in a hospital;

Outpatients of a hospital where the prescriber writes the order in the medical chart and the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient does not have the opportunity to handle the written order;

Residents of a nursing home or an assisted living facility;

Inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33;

Inpatients or residents of any facility that is registered by the United States drug enforcement administration as a narcotic treatment program and is subject to the record keeping provisions of 21 CFR § 1304.24;

Individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility;

Patients receiving prescriptions from mail order pharmacies; or

Patients receiving home deliveries from pharmacies.

A healthcare provider in violation of this section shall only be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the provider's licensing board. Section 53-11-401 shall not apply to penalties imposed under this section.

The board of pharmacy is authorized to promulgate rules to implement this section in accord with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2014, ch. 872, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 872, § 2. July 1, 2014.